Utah statutes.
41-3-409.5.   Unbranded certificate of title -- Application requirements --
Recording requirements -- Recurrence of nonconformities.
(1)  To obtain an unbranded certificate of title to a nonconforming vehicle:
(a)  the vehicle must have been originally titled in Utah;
(b)  the vehicle must have been originally branded in Utah under Section
41-1a-522; and
(c)  the manufacturer must submit to the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division an
original application, completed by the manufacturer, for an unbranded
certificate of title  that meets the requirements of Subsection (2) and a copy
of the application to the owner of the motor vehicle and to the lienholder, if
any, shown on the certificate of title.
(2)  The form of the application shall be approved by the Motor Vehicle
Enforcement Division and shall include:
(a)  the manufacturer's certification that:
(i)  all nonconformities listed in the disclosure under Section 41-3-408 are
completely cured;
(ii)  the manufacturer warrants to all subsequent purchasers that the
nonconformities are cured for the greater of:
(A)  the remaining balance of the manufacturer's original express warranty
period; or
(B)  one year from the date of the first subsequent retail sale or lease; and
(iii)  the vehicle identification number has not been removed, falsified,
altered, defaced, or destroyed;
(b)  a description of the motor vehicle, including its vehicle identification
number, make, model, and year of manufacture;
(c)  the owner of the motor vehicle and name of the lienholder, if any, shown
on the branded certificate of title; and
(d)  a description of the repairs made to cure the nonconformities of the
motor vehicle, including how they were made.
(3)  If an application for an unbranded certificate of title meets all the
requirements of this section, the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division shall
submit the completed application to the Motor Vehicle Division for issuance of
an unbranded title in accordance with Section 41-1a-522.
(4)  If a motor vehicle certificate of title is unbranded pursuant to this
section and a subsequent purchaser or lessee of the vehicle prevails against a
manufacturer in any action involving a nonconformity that was certified as
cured pursuant to this section, that purchaser or lessee is entitled to court
costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
